Washington statutes.
RCW 2.30.130

Early childhood court programs—Transitional provision.

Any early childhood court program in operation as of July 25, 2021, shall have until January 1, 2022, to adjust its practices to comply with RCW 2.30.100 and 2.30.110.

[ 2021 c 285 s 5.]

NOTES:

Findings—2021 c 285: See note following RCW 2.30.100.